Illinois, session 104th, SB1860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the State 5Disability Ombudsperson Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. Individuals with reported 7disabilities make up an estimated nearly 12% of the population 8of Illinois with another 10% estimated to be unreported. 9People living with disabilities are entitled to the fair and 10equal opportunities in society and all aspects of their lives. 11Yet they routinely face barriers and discrimination that limit 12their access to fair and equal opportunity in housing, 13education, employment, health care, transportation, and other 14daily activities. Therefore, the General Assembly finds that a 15State Disability Ombudsperson dedicated to advocating for the 16rights of disabled persons, in conjunction with the Long-term 17Care Ombudsperson and Home Care Ombudsperson, advances the 18goals of the State to ensure that all citizens can participate 19in society fully and free from discrimination. 20    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Department" means the Department of Human Rights. 22    "Disabled person" means a person who has a physical or   SB1860- 2 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major 2life activities, a person who has a history or record of such 3an impairment, or a person who is perceived by others as having 4such an impairment. 5    Section 15. Office of the State Disability Ombudsperson.6    (a) There is created in the Department of Human Rights, 7under the supervision and control of the Director, the Office 8of the State Disability Ombudsperson.9    (b) The Department shall name an Ombudsperson and other 10persons as necessary to discharge the requirements of this 11Act. The Ombudsperson shall have the powers and duties as 12delegated by the Department, in addition to the powers and 13duties set forth in this Act.14    (c) Information and advice provided by the Ombudsperson 15has no binding legal effect and is not subject to the 16provisions of the Illinois Administrative Code. 17    Section 20. Education. On or before July 1, 2026, the 18Ombudsperson shall offer training, outreach, and educational 19materials, and may arrange for the offering of courses open to 20the public in subjects relevant to:21        (1) disability services;22        (2) disability rights training;23        (3) disability rights laws;24        (4) disability benefits;  SB1860- 3 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1        (5) accessibility; and2        (6) any other topic the Ombudsperson finds relevant 3    and beneficial to disabled persons and the broader 4    community. 5    Section 25. Website; toll-free number.6    (a) The Office shall maintain on the Department's website 7the following information:8        (1) the text of this Act and all other Acts that the 9    Office determines relevant to the population it serves, 10    including, but not limited to, the American with 11    Disabilities Act, the Individuals with Disabilities 12    Education Act, the Disabilities Services Act of 2003, the 13    Environmental Barriers Act, and the Fair Housing Act;14        (2) a description of the services provided by the 15    Ombudsperson and information on how to contact the 16    Ombudsperson for assistance; and17        (3) any other information that the Ombudsperson 18    determines is useful to the population it serves.19    (b) The Office shall make available during regular 20business hours a statewide toll-free telephone number to 21provide information and resources on matters relating to 22disability rights and disability services. 23    Section 30. Duties and services.24    (a) The Office of the Ombudsperson shall:  SB1860- 4 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1        (1) prescribe a method by which complaints to the 2    office are made, reviewed, and acted upon;3        (2) monitor the development and implementation of 4    federal, State, or local laws, rules, and policies 5    affecting the rights and benefits of disabled persons;6        (3) comment on and recommend to public and private 7    agencies regarding laws, rules, and policies affecting 8    disabled persons;9        (4) conduct public forums to obtain information about 10    and publicize issues affecting disabled persons; and11        (5) investigate the quality of services provided to 12    disabled persons and determine the extent to which quality 13    assurance mechanisms within State and county government 14    work to promote the health, safety, and welfare of 15    disabled persons.16    (b) Upon receiving a request, complaint, or other 17information affording reasonable grounds to believe that the 18rights of disabled persons have been violated or the health, 19safety, welfare, or rights of disabled persons have been 20adversely affected, the Office shall:21        (1) gather information and evaluate any act, practice, 22    policy, procedure, or administrative action that may 23    violate the rights of disabled persons or adversely affect 24    the health, safety, welfare, or rights of disabled 25    persons; and26        (2) mediate or advocate on behalf of disabled persons   SB1860- 5 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1    on issues, including, but not limited to, education, 2    employment, health care, housing, and transportation;3    (c) The Office shall assist in the application of public 4benefits when services are requested;5    (d) The Office shall provide assistance and education, 6when requested, to disabled persons on matters, including, but 7not limited to, education, employment, health care, housing, 8and transportation; and9    (e) The Office shall establish a procedure for referral to 10disability rights organizations, community-based services, and 11legal and court room advocacy when services are requested or 12deemed necessary by the Ombudsperson. 13    Section 35. Confidentiality. All information related to 14requests, complaints, concerns, and other communications 15reported to the Ombudsperson shall be treated as confidential 16to the extent permitted by law. 17    Section 40. Reports.18    (a) The Office shall submit an annual written report on 19the activities of the Office to the Governor, the President of 20the Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of 21the House of Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the 22House of Representatives. The report shall summarize the 23activities of the previous year, including, but not limited 24to:  SB1860- 6 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1        (1) annual workload and performance data, including:2            (A) the number and type of complaints or concerns 3        reported to the Office and the manner in which such 4        complaints or concerns were handled;5            (B) the number and type of requests for assistance 6        from the Office and the manner in which such 7        assistance was conducted;8            (C) the types of training, education, or other 9        information provided and the manner in which it was 10        conducted; and11            (D) the staff time required to provide the 12        assistance, training, education, or other information;13        (2) analysis of identified trends in the issues 14    reported to and handled by the Office; and15        (3) recommendations for statutory reform.16    (b) The Office shall submit its report detailing the 17previous year no later than January 15 of each year. The report 18shall be made available to the public on the Office's official 19website.20    (c) Upon receipt of the report, the General Assembly shall 21conduct a formal joint hearing as decided by the President of 22the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives to be 23briefed on the work of the Office and potential legislative 24recommendations outlined in the report. 25    Section 45. Rules. The Department shall adopt such rules   SB1860- 7 -LRB104 10514 JRC 20589 b1as are necessary for the administration and enforcement of the 2provisions of this Act. Any rule adopted under this Act is 3subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Illinois 4Administrative Procedure Act.